California statutes. Labor Code
(iii) Any employer or insurer on behalf of its insured employers required to remit payment by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section may request a waiver of the requirement from the director to allow for an alternate manner of payment. The director has the sole discretion to decide whether to grant a waiver and the sole discretion to determine the terms, conditions, and duration of a waiver.

(iv) For purposes of this
 section, “electronic funds transfer” has the same meaning as defined in Section 20027.5 of the Government Code, except any reference in that section to the board shall mean the director. “Electronic funds transfer” also includes transfers authorized under Section 11255 of the Government Code.

(E) Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, except for penalties collected from private self-insured employers, which shall be deposited into the Self-Insurance Plans Fund as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 3702.5.

(2) The surcharge levied by the director for the Occupational Safety and Health Fund, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), shall not generate revenues in excess of fifty-seven million dollars ($57,000,000) on and after the 2013–14 fiscal year, adjusted for each
 fiscal year as appropriate to fund any increases in the appropriation as approved by the Legislature, and to reconcile any over/under assessments from previous fiscal years pursuant to Sections 15606 and 15609 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. For the 2013–14 fiscal year only, the revenue cap established in this paragraph shall be reduced by an amount equivalent to the balance transferred from the Cal-OSHA Targeted Inspection and Consultation Fund established in Section 62.7, less any amount of that balance loaned to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund, to the Occupational Safety and Health Fund pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) The surcharge levied by the director for the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund, pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), shall not exceed forty-six million dollars ($46,000,000) in the 2013–14 fiscal year, adjusted as appropriate to fund any increases in the appropriation as approved by the Legislature, and to reconcile any over/under assessments from previous fiscal years pursuant to Sections 15606 and 15609 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) The regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) to (3), inclusive, shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 3.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

62.8.

Five million dollars ($5,000,000) is hereby appropriated for transfer by the State Controller upon order of the Director of Finance from the Cal-OSHA Targeted Inspection and Consultation Fund as a loan to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund. This loan shall be repaid to the Occupational Safety and Health Fund by June 30, 2015. This loan shall be repaid with interest calculated at the rate earned by the Pooled Money Investment Account at the time of the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 28, Sec. 35.   (SB 71)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

63.

The Director may authorize the refund of moneys received or collected by the department in payment of license fees or for other services in cases where the license can not lawfully be issued or the service rendered to the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 947.)
-------------------------------------------

64.

The Labor Commissioner may enter into reciprocal agreements with the labor department or corresponding agency of any other state or with the person, board, officer, or commission authorized to act for and on behalf of that department or agency, for the collection in that other state of claims or judgments for wages and other demands based upon claims previously assigned to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

64.5.

When requested by the State Board of Equalization, the department may permit any duly authorized representative of that agency to transmit to the State Board of Equalization information available in the department’s records that indicates a retail establishment is operating without a seller’s permit required by the State Board of Equalization, to assist the State Board of Equalization in determining compliance with the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Mediation [66. - 67.]

66.

The services of the department pursuant to Section 65 shall be conducted by a unit within the department to be known as the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

67.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the director may seek and collect reimbursement from private and public sector employers, labor unions, and employee organizations for election, arbitration, and training and facilitation services provided by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service pursuant to Section 65 and for representation services, including the provision of hearing officers, related to public transit labor relations provided by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service pursuant to the Public Utilities Code.

(b) The director shall adopt regulations implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 24.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Industrial Welfare Commission [70. - 74.]

70.

There is in the Department of Industrial Relations the Industrial Welfare Commission which consists of five members. The members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor, with the consent of the Senate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

70.1.

The Industrial Welfare Commission shall be composed of two representatives of organized labor who are members of recognized labor organizations, two representatives of employers, and one representative of the general public. The membership shall include members of both sexes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 513, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

71.

The term of office of the members of the Industrial Welfare Commission shall be four years and they shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successors. The terms of the members of the commission in office at the time this code takes effect shall expire on January 15th of that year which for the particular member has heretofore been determined. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired terms.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

72.

The members of the commission shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day’s actual attendance at meetings and other official business of the commission and shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

73.

The Industrial Welfare Commission may employ necessary assistants, officers, experts, and such other employees as it deems necessary. All such personnel of the commission shall be under the supervision of the chairman or an executive officer to whom the chairman delegates such responsibility. All such personnel shall be appointed pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 18000) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except for the one exempt deputy or employee allowed by subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

74.

The Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, for the purpose of enforcing Industrial Welfare Commission orders and provisions of this code, may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, and records. Obedience to subpoenas issued by the chief of the division shall be enforced by the courts.

The Chief and enforcement deputies of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement may administer oaths and examine witnesses under oath for the purpose of enforcing Industrial Welfare Commission orders and provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation [75. - 78.]

75.

(a) There is in the department the Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation. The commission shall be composed of eight voting members. Four voting members shall represent organized labor, and four voting members shall represent employers. Not more than one employer member shall represent public agencies. Two of the employer and two of the labor members shall be appointed by the Governor. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint one employer and one labor representative. The public employer representative shall be appointed by the Governor. No action of the commission shall be valid unless agreed to by a majority of the membership and by not less than two members representing organized labor and two members representing employers.

(b) The commission shall select one of the members representing organized labor to chair the commission during the 1994 calendar year, and thereafter the commission shall alternatively select an employer and organized labor representative to chair the commission for one-year terms.

(c) The initial terms of the members of the commission shall be four years, and they shall hold office until the appointment of a successor. However, the initial terms of one employer and one labor member appointed by the Governor shall expire on December 31, 1995; the initial terms of the members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules shall expire December 31, 1996; the initial terms of the members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly shall expire on December 31, 1997; and the initial term of one employer and one labor member appointed by the Governor shall expire on December 31, 1998. Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment to the unexpired term.

(d) The commission shall meet every other month and upon the call of the chair. Meetings shall be open to the public. Members of the commission shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of their actual attendance at meetings of the commission and other official business of the commission and shall also receive their actual and necessary traveling expenses incurred in the performance of their duty as a member. Payment of per diem and traveling expenses shall be made from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund, when appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

76.

The commission may employ officers, assistants, experts, and other employees it deems necessary. All personnel of the commission shall be under the supervision of the chair or an executive officer to whom he or she delegates this responsibility. All personnel shall be appointed pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except for the one exemption allowed by subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 227, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

77.

(a) The commission shall conduct a continuing examination of the workers’ compensation system, as defined in Section 4 of Article XIV of the California Constitution, and of the state’s activities to prevent industrial injuries and occupational diseases. The commission may conduct or contract for studies it deems necessary to carry out its responsibilities. In carrying out its duties, the commission shall examine other states’ workers’ compensation programs and activities to prevent industrial injuries and occupational diseases. All state departments and agencies, and any rating organization licensed by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11750) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, shall cooperate with the commission and upon reasonable request provide information and data in their possession that the commission deems necessary for the purpose of carrying out its responsibilities. The commission shall issue an annual report on the state of the workers’ compensation system, including recommendations for administrative or legislative modifications which would improve the operation of the system. The report shall be made available to the Governor, the Legislature, and the public on request.

(b) On or before July 1, 2003, and periodically thereafter as it deems necessary, the commission shall issue a report and recommendations on the improvement and simplification of the notices required to be provided by insurers and self-insured employers.

(c) The commission succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Health and Safety Commission which is hereby abolished, including the administration of grants to assist in establishing effective occupational injury and illness prevention programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

77.5.

(a) On or before July 1, 2004, the commission shall conduct a survey and evaluation of evidence-based, peer-reviewed, nationally recognized standards of care, including existing medical treatment utilization standards, including independent medical review, as used in other states, at the national level, and in other medical benefit systems. The survey shall be updated periodically.

(b) On or before October 1, 2004, the commission shall issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the administrative director for purposes of the adoption of a medical treatment utilization schedule.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 639, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

77.8.

The Commission on Health and Safety and Workers’ Compensation shall conduct a study of the impacts claims of COVID-19 have had on the workers’ compensation system, including overall impacts on indemnity benefits, medical benefits, and death benefits, including differences in the impacts across differing occupational groups, and including the effect of Sections 3212.87 and 3212.88. A preliminary report or a final report shall be delivered to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and the Governor by December 31, 2021, and the final report shall be delivered to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, and the Governor no later than April 30, 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 85, Sec. 1.   (SB 1159)   Effective September 17, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

78.

(a) The commission shall review and approve applications from employers and employee organizations, as well as applications submitted jointly by an employer organization and an employee organization, for grants to assist in establishing effective occupational injury and illness prevention programs. The commission shall establish policies for the evaluation of these applications and shall give priority to applications proposing to target high-risk industries and occupations, including those with high injury or illness rates, and those in which employees are exposed to one or more hazardous substances or conditions or where there is a demonstrated need for research to determine effective strategies for the prevention of occupational illnesses or injuries.

(b) Civil and administrative penalties assessed and collected pursuant to Sections 129.5 and 4628 shall be deposited in the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund. Moneys in the fund, when appropriated by the Legislature to fund the grants under subdivision (a) and other activities and expenses of the commission set forth in this code, shall be expended by the department, upon approval by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 866, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Division of Labor Standards Enforcement [79. - 107.]

79.

There is in the Department of Industrial Relations the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall be under the direction of an executive officer known as the Chief, Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, who shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation of the Senate, and shall hold office at the pleasure of the Director of Industrial Relations. The annual salary of the chief shall be determined by the Department of Finance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

80.

The headquarters of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, hereafter in this chapter referred to as the division, shall be located in San Francisco.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

81.

The employees of the division shall devote their full time to the work of the division and shall receive their actual necessary traveling expenses. The division shall maintain offices in San Francisco, Los Angeles, Sacramento, San Diego, Oakland, Fresno, San Jose, and in such other places as the Labor Commissioner may deem necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

82.

(a) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Division of Labor Law Enforcement, which is hereby abolished.

(b) All powers, duties, purposes, and responsibilities of the Labor Commissioner, who is Chief of the Division of Labor Law Enforcement, are hereby transferred to the Labor Commissioner who is the Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(c) Any regulation or other action made, prescribed, issued, granted, or performed by the abolished Division of Labor Law Enforcement in the administration, performance, or implementation of a function transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall remain in effect and shall be deemed to be a regulation or action of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement unless and until repealed, modified, or rescinded by such division.

(d) Whenever any reference is made in any law to the abolished Division of Labor Law Enforcement, it shall be deemed to be a reference to, and to mean, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

83.

(a) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the Division of Industrial Welfare, which is hereby abolished.

(b) All powers, duties, purposes, and responsibilities of the Chief, Division of Industrial Welfare are hereby transferred to the Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(c) Any regulation or other action made, prescribed, issued, granted, or performed by the abolished Division of Industrial Welfare in the administration, performance, or implementation of a function transferred pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall remain in effect and shall be deemed to be a regulation or action of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement unless and until repealed, modified, or rescinded by such division.

(d) Whenever any reference is made in any law to the abolished Division of Industrial Welfare it shall be deemed to be a reference to, and to mean, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

87.

All persons, other than temporary employees, serving in the state civil service and engaged in the performance of a function transferred pursuant to this chapter, or engaged in the administration of a law, the administration of which is transferred pursuant to this chapter, shall, in accordance with Section 19050.9 of the Government Code, remain in the state civil service and are hereby transferred to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement. The status, positions, and rights of those persons shall not be affected by their transfer and shall continue to be retained by them pursuant to the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 5 of the Government Code), except as to positions the duties of which are vested in a position that is exempt from civil
 service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 135.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

88.

The personnel records of all employees transferred pursuant to Section 87 shall remain in the Department of Industrial Relations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

89.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall have possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, moneys, funds, appropriations, land, and other property, real or personal, held for the benefit or use of the Division of Labor Law Enforcement and the Division of Industrial Welfare with respect to the functions transferred pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

89.5.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement may expend the money in any appropriation or in any special fund in the State Treasury made available by law for the administration of the statutes the administration of which is committed to it pursuant to this chapter, or for the use, support, or maintenance of any board, bureau, commission, department, office, or officer whose duties, powers, and functions have been transferred to, and conferred upon, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement pursuant to this chapter. Such expenditures by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall be made in accordance with law in carrying out the purposes for which the appropriations were made or the special funds created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

90.

The Labor Commissioner, his deputies and agents, shall have free access to all places of labor. Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who refuses admission to the Labor Commissioner or his deputy or agent or who, upon request, willfully neglects or refuses to furnish them any statistics or information, pertaining to their lawful duties, which are in his possession or under his control, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 188.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

90.2.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise required by federal law, an employer shall provide a notice to each current employee, by posting in the language the employer normally uses to communicate employment-related information to the employee, of any inspections of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms or other employment records conducted by an immigration agency within 72 hours of receiving notice of the inspection. Written notice shall also be given within 72 hours to the employee’s authorized representative, if any. The posted
 notice shall contain the following information:

(A) The name of the immigration agency conducting the inspections of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms or other employment records.

(B) The date that the employer received notice of the inspection.

(C) The nature of the inspection to the extent known.

(D) A copy of the Notice of Inspection of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms for the inspection to be conducted.

(2) On or before July 1, 2018, the Labor Commissioner shall develop a
 template posting that employers may use to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) to inform employees of a notice of inspection to be conducted of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms or other employment records conducted by an immigration agency. The posting shall be available on the Labor Commissioner’s Internet Web site so that it is accessible to any employer.

(3) An employer, upon reasonable request, shall provide an affected
 employee a copy of the Notice of Inspection of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms.

(b) (1) Except as otherwise required by federal law, an employer shall provide to each current affected employee, and to the employee’s authorized representative, if any, a copy of the written immigration agency notice that provides the results of the inspection of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms or other employment records within 72 hours of its receipt of the notice. Within 72 hours of its receipt of this notice, the employer shall also provide to each affected employee, and to the affected employee’s authorized representative, if any, written notice of the obligations of the employer and the affected employee arising from the results of the inspection of I-9 Employment Eligibility Verification forms or other
 employment records. The notice shall relate to the affected employee only and shall be delivered by hand at the workplace if possible and, if hand delivery is not possible, by mail and email, if the email address of the employee is known, and to the employee’s authorized representative. The notice shall contain the following information:

(A) A description of any and all deficiencies or other items identified in the written immigration inspection results notice related to the affected employee.

(B) The time period for correcting any potential deficiencies identified by the immigration agency.

(C) The time and date of any meeting with the employer to correct any identified deficiencies.

(D) Notice that the employee has the right to representation during any meeting scheduled with the employer.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, an “affected employee” is an employee identified by the immigration agency inspection results to be an employee who may lack work authorization, or an employee whose work authorization documents have been identified by the immigration agency inspection to have deficiencies.

(c) An employer who fails to provide the notices required by this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of two thousand dollars ($2,000)
 up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a first violation and five thousand dollars ($5,000)
 up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each subsequent violation. This section does not require a penalty to be imposed upon an employer or person who fails to provide notice to an employee at the express and specific direction or request of the federal government. The penalty shall be recoverable by the Labor Commissioner.

(d) For purposes of this section, an “employee’s authorized representative” means an exclusive collective bargaining representative.

(e) This section applies to public and private employers.

(f) In accordance with state and federal law, nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted, construed, or applied to restrict or limit an employer’s compliance with a memorandum of understanding governing the use of the federal E-Verify system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 492, Sec. 4.   (AB 450)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

90.3.

(a) It is the policy of this state to vigorously enforce the laws requiring employers to secure the payment of compensation as required by Section 3700 and to protect employers who comply with the law from those who attempt to gain a competitive advantage at the expense of their workers by failing to secure the payment of compensation.

(b) In order to ensure that the laws requiring employers to secure the payment of compensation are adequately enforced, the Labor Commissioner shall establish and maintain a program that systematically identifies unlawfully uninsured employers. The Labor Commissioner, in consultation with the Administrative Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation and the director, may prioritize targets for the program in consideration of available resources. The employers shall be identified from data from the Uninsured Employers’ Fund, the Employment Development Department, the rating organizations licensed by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11750) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, and any other sources deemed likely to lead to the identification of unlawfully uninsured employers. All state departments and agencies and any rating organization licensed by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 11750) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code shall cooperate with the Labor Commissioner and on reasonable request provide information and data in their possession reasonably necessary to carry out the program.

(c) As part of the program, the Labor Commissioner shall establish procedures for ensuring that employers with payroll but with no record of workers’ compensation coverage are contacted and, if no valid reason for the lack of record of coverage is shown, inspected on a priority basis.

(d) The Labor Commissioner shall annually, not later than March 1, prepare a report concerning the effectiveness of the program, publish it on the Labor Commissioner’s Web site, as well as notify the Legislature, the Governor, the Insurance Commissioner, and the Administrative Director of the Division of Workers’ Compensation of the report’s availability. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of employers identified from records of the Employment Development Department who were screened for matching records of insurance coverage or self-insurance.

(2) The number of employers identified from records of the Employment Development Department that were matched to records of insurance coverage or self-insurance.

(3) The number of employers identified from records of the Employment Development Department that were notified that there was no record of their insurance coverage.

(4) The number of employers responding to the notices, and the nature of the responses, including the number of employers who failed to provide satisfactory proof of workers’ compensation coverage and including information about the reasons that employers who provided satisfactory proof of coverage were not appropriately recognized in the comparison performed under subdivision (b). The report may include recommendations to improve the accuracy and efficiency of the program in screening for unlawfully uninsured employers.

(5) The number of employers identified as unlawfully uninsured from records of the Uninsured Employers’ Benefits Trust Fund or from records of the Division of Workers’ Compensation, and the number of those employers that are also identifiable from the records of the Employment Development Department. These statistics shall be reported in a manner to permit analysis and estimation of the percentage of unlawfully uninsured employers that do not report wages to the Employment Development Department.

(6) The number of employers inspected.

(7) The number and amount of penalties assessed pursuant to Section 3722 as a result of the program.

(8) The number and amount of penalties collected pursuant to Section 3722 as a result of the program.

(e) The allocation of funds from the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 62.5 shall not increase the total amount of surcharges pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 62.5. Startup costs for this program shall be allocated from the fiscal year 2007–08 surcharges collected. The total amount allocated for this program under subdivision (a) of Section 62.5 in subsequent years shall not exceed the amount of penalties collected pursuant to Section 3722 as a result of the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 662, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

90.5.

(a) It is the policy of this state to vigorously enforce minimum labor standards in order to ensure employees are not required or permitted to work under substandard unlawful conditions or for employers that have not secured the payment of compensation, and to protect employers who comply with the law from those who attempt to gain a competitive advantage at the expense of their workers by failing to comply with minimum labor standards.

(b) In order to ensure that minimum labor standards are adequately enforced, the Labor Commissioner shall establish and maintain a field enforcement unit, which shall be administratively and physically separate from offices of the division that accept and determine individual employee complaints. The unit shall have offices in Los Angeles, San Francisco, San Jose, San Diego, Sacramento, and any other locations that the Labor Commissioner deems appropriate. The unit shall have primary responsibility for administering and enforcing those statutes and regulations most effectively enforced through field investigations, including Sections 226, 1021, 1021.5, 1193.5, 1193.6, 1194.5, 1197, 1198, 1771, 1776, 1777.5, 2651, 2673, 2675, and 3700, in accordance with the plan adopted by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to subdivision (c). Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of this unit in enforcing any statute or regulation in the course of its investigations.

(c) The Labor Commissioner shall adopt an enforcement plan for the field enforcement unit. The plan shall identify priorities for investigations to be undertaken by the unit that ensure the available resources will be concentrated in industries, occupations, and areas in which employees are relatively low paid and unskilled, and those in which there has been a history of violations of the statutes cited in subdivision (b), and those with high rates of noncompliance with Section 3700.

(d) The Labor Commissioner shall annually report to the Legislature, not later than March 1, concerning the effectiveness of the field enforcement unit. The report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The enforcement plan adopted by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to subdivision (c), and the rationale for the priorities identified in the plan.

(2) The number of establishments investigated by the unit, and the number of types of violations found.

(3) The amount of wages found to be unlawfully withheld from workers, and the amount of unpaid wages recovered for workers.

(4) The amount of penalties and unpaid wages transferred to the General Fund as a result of the efforts of the unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 6, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

90.6.

(a) In the case of an investigation by the field enforcement unit, the date of a written notice by the Labor Commissioner to an employer, or other person or entity that may be liable under a provision of this code, that an investigation has commenced shall be deemed the date an action has commenced for purposes of any statute of limitations applicable to determining the period of time for which wages, penalties, damages, or other amounts may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner, which will then be tolled for a period of 12 months. After expiration of the 12-month period, the time under the applicable statute of limitations will resume running. The notice provided by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section shall identify the employer or other person or entity subject to investigation, the time period
 covered by the investigation, and a reference to this section that shall constitute notice of the potential claims under the identified investigation.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to the following:

(1) Sections 558 and 1197.1.

(2) Unpaid minimum and overtime wages under Sections 510, 1194, and 1197.

(3) Any applicable wage order of the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(4) Any applicable local minimum wage or overtime law.

(5) Wages exceeding minimum wages subject to determination under Section 1195.5.

(6) Penalty wages for late payment under Section 203.

(7) Liquidated damages under Section 1194.2.

(8) Itemized wage statements under Section 226.

(9) Compensation for rest and recovery periods and nonproductive time for piece rate employees under Section 226.2.

(10) Meal, rest, and recovery periods under Section 226.7.

(11) Claims under Section 2810.3.

(12) Expense reimbursements under Section 2802.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 8.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

90.7.

When the division determines that an employer has violated Section 226.2, 1021, 1021.5, 1197, or 1771, or otherwise determines that an employer may have failed to report all the payroll of the employer’s employees as required by law, the division shall advise the Insurance Commissioner and request that an audit be ordered pursuant to Section 11736.5 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1386, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

90.8.

(a) As an alternative to a judgment lien, the Labor Commissioner may create a lien on real property to secure the amount due to the Labor Commissioner under any citation, findings, or decision that has become final and may be entered as a judgment, including those that have become final under Sections 1197.1, 226.5, 1023, and 1289. The lien on real property may be created by the Labor Commissioner recording a certificate of lien, for amounts due from the cited parties named in the final citation, findings, or decision, with the county recorder of any county in which the parties’ real property may be located. The lien attaches to all interests in real property of those parties located in the county where the lien is created to which a judgment lien may attach pursuant to Section 697.340 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure, with the same priority as a judgment lien.

(b) The certificate of lien shall include information as prescribed by Section 27288.1 of the Government Code.

(c) The recorder shall accept and record the certificate of lien and shall index it as prescribed by law.

(d) Upon payment of the amount due under the final citation, findings or decision, including any interest and costs that have lawfully accrued on the original amount, the Labor Commissioner shall issue a certificate of release, releasing the lien created under subdivision (a) of this section. The certificate of release may be recorded by any person at that person’s expense.
